Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 2. Warehouse Receipts

§ 2061.
Issue of warehouse receipt for goods not received.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent or servant of a warehouseman, who issues or aids in issuing a warehouse receipt knowing that the goods for which the warehouse receipt is issued, have not been actually received by the warehouseman, or are not under his or her actual control at the time of issuing the warehouse receipt, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 13.

§ 2062.
Issue of warehouse receipt containing false statement.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouseman, who fraudulently issues or aids in fraudulently issuing a warehouse receipt for goods knowing that it contains any false statement, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 14.

§ 2063.
Issue of duplicate warehouse receipts not so marked.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouseman, who issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional negotiable warehouse receipt for goods knowing that a former negotiable warehouse receipt for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and uncancelled, without plainly placing upon the face thereof the word “Duplicate,” except in the case of a lost or destroyed warehouse receipt after proceedings as provided for in 9 V.S.A. § 7—601, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 15.

§ 2064.
Issue for warehouseman’s goods of warehouse receipts that do not state his or her ownership.

Where there are deposited with or held by a warehouseman goods of which he or she is owner, either solely or jointly or in common with others, the warehouseman, or any of his or her officers, agents, or servants, who knowing this ownership, issues or aids in issuing a negotiable warehouse receipt for those goods that does not state that ownership, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 16.

§ 2065.
Delivery of goods without obtaining negotiable warehouse receipt.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouseman, who delivers goods out of the possession of the warehouseman, knowing that a negotiable warehouse receipt, the negotiation of which would transfer the right to the possession of such goods, is outstanding and uncancelled, without obtaining the possession of the warehouse receipt at or before the time of such delivery, except in the cases provided for in 9A V.S.A. §§ 7—205, 7—209 and 7—601, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 17.

§ 2066.
Negotiation of warehouse receipt for goods subject to a security interest.

A person who deposits goods to which he or she has not title or in which there is a security interest, and who takes for the goods a negotiable warehouse receipt which he or she afterwards negotiates for value with intent to deceive and without disclosing his or her want of title or the existence of the security interest, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 18.